Alabama, session 2026rs, SB73.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the term
Page 1

Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the term
SB73 INTRODUCED
"athletic association" has the same meaning as provided in
Section 16-1-52.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
(b) A public K-12 school may not be a member of an
athletic association unless the association's governing body,
including a central board of control, is comprised of at least
50 percent of members who are appointed by the Governor,
Speaker of the House of Representatives, President Pro Tempore
of the Senate, or the Lieutenant Governor, including four
members who are appointed by the Governor, four members who
are appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives,
four members who are appointed by the President Pro Tempore of
the Senate, and three members who are appointed by the
Lieutenant Governor.
(c) A public K-12 school may not be a member of an
athletic association that enforces a rule, regulation, bylaw,
or other directive relating to the eligibility of
student-athletes to participate in athletics which was not
adopted in accordance with the Alabama Administrative
Procedure Act, Chapter 22 of Title 41, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. The Legislative Council may authorize any
entity to voluntarily adopt rules pursuant to the Alabama
Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 22 of Title 41, Code of
Alabama 1975.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2